Utah statutes.
77-32-306.   County or municipal legislative body to provide legal defense.
(1)  The county or municipal legislative body shall either:
(a)  contract to provide the legal defense, including counsel, defense
resources, or both, as prescribed by this chapter, and as available, through:
(i)  a legal aid association; or
(ii)  one or more defense associations or attorneys and qualified defense
resources; or
(b)  authorize the court to provide the services prescribed by this chapter by
assigning a qualified attorney in each case.
(2)  A county may create a county legal defender's office to provide for the
legal defense, including counsel and defense resources or both, as prescribed
by this chapter.
(3)  A county legal defender's office  may, through the county legislative
body contract with other counties and municipalities within a judicial
district to provide the legal services as prescribed.
(4)  When a county or municipality has contracted under Subsection (1)(a) or a
county has created a legal defender's office as provided under Subsection (2)
to provide the legal counsel and defense resources required by this chapter,
the contracted legal aid association or attorneys, contracted defense
resources, and the county legal defender's office are the exclusive source
from which the legal defense may be provided, unless the court finds a
compelling reason for the appointment of noncontracting attorneys and defense
resources, in which case the judge shall state the compelling reason on the
record.
